Utah statutes.
63A-13-602.   Rulemaking authority.

The office may make rules, pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, and Section 63A-13-306, that establish policies, procedures, and practices, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, relating to:

(1)  inspecting and monitoring the state Medicaid Program;

(2)  discovering and investigating potential fraud, waste, or abuse in the State Medicaid program;

(3)  developing and implementing the principles and standards described in Subsection 63A-13-202(1)(q);

(4)  auditing, inspecting, and evaluating the functioning of the division under Subsection 63A-13-202(1)(h);

(5)  conducting an audit under Subsection 63A-13-202(1)(h) or (2); or

(6)  ordering a hold on the payment of a claim for reimbursement under Section 63A-13-205.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 12, 2013 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 359, 2013 General Session

